California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
 principal coupons attached to them, payable in annual order, on the second day of January of every year after the next September 1st following the date of the bond, until all are paid. Each principal coupon shall be for an even annual proportion of the principal of the bond.

(e) Have semiannual interest coupons attached to them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 293, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

6462.

The bonds shall extend over a period not exceeding 24 years from the second day of January next succeeding the next September 1st following their date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 825.)
-------------------------------------------

6462.1.

The legislative body conducting the proceedings may provide for a classification of assessments into different terms of maturity so that some assessments may be made to mature over a shorter period of time than other assessments and may also provide for assessments to mature in other than equal annual amounts.

In such event, the bond declaration in the resolution of intention, assessment, and notice of recording the assessment may recite that the last installment of bonds shall mature a maximum rather than an exact number of years from the second day of January next succeeding the next September 1st following their date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 527.)
-------------------------------------------

6463.

The interest shall be payable semiannually, by coupon, on the second days of January and July, respectively, of each year after the date of the bonds. The bonds shall bear the date of the 31st day after the date of recordation of the warrant, whether or not such date falls on a Sunday or holiday. The first interest coupon shall be for interest from the date of the bonds and shall be payable to the holder thereof on the January 2nd next succeeding the September 1st or the July 2nd next succeeding the March 1st, as the case may be, next following the date of the bond. The rate of interest shall not exceed the amount established pursuant to Section 53531 of the
 Government Code at the time the legislative body adopts the resolution of intention pursuant to Section 5132.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 293, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

6464.

The legislative body conducting the proceedings may elect, in the resolution of intention, to have the redemption provisions of said bond provide a premium of 5 percent of the unmatured principal. In such case, the words, “together with a premium of 5 percent of said unmatured principal” shall be added after the redemption clause in the bond form, and Section 6447 shall be deemed to require the property owner to pay a like sum in order to pay and discharge such lien.

As used in this section, “unmatured principal” means those installments of principal that are due to be paid at future dates and for which no corresponding payments of
 interest will be payable pursuant to the provision of Section 6447.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 520.)
-------------------------------------------

6465.

Said bonds may be made payable to the contractor or to his last assignee as shown by the assignment filed with and approved by the superintendent of streets. Said bonds may also be made payable to bearer in which case the words “or order” may be deleted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 856.)
-------------------------------------------

6466.

The provisions of Articles 2 (commencing with Section 53430) and 3 (commencing with Section 53460) of Chapter 3, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code shall apply to lost or destroyed or mutilated bonds issued pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 654.)
-------------------------------------------

6467.

In the event there are unpaid assessments levied against public property which are payable as provided in Section 5302.5 of this code, the treasurer shall, simultaneously with the issuance of bonds, if bonds are to be issued in the proceedings, issue certificates representing assessments against public property. A separate certificate shall be issued to represent each assessment against public property. The certificates will provide for payment thereof as provided in Section 5302.5, and each certificate shall read substantially as follows:
UNITED STATES OF AMERICAState of CaliforniaCounty of ________(assessment & diagram nbr.)(amount)________________certificate of ownership of assessment against public property
Pursuant to the provisions of Sections 5301 and 5302.5 of Division 7, Part 3, Chapter 13 of the Streets and Highways Code of the State of California, (Improvement Act of 1911), and pursuant to proceedings taken by the ____ of the ____, County of ____, State of California, under the provisions of Division ____, of the Streets and Highways Code, the
 undersigned treasurer of ____ does hereby certify as follows:

1. The ____ of ____ by Resolution of Intention No. ____, passed on the ____ day of ____, 20__, and proceedings subsequent thereto, levied an assessment against property owned by ____ in the sum of ____ dollars ($____).

2. Said assessment was levied on the ____ day of ____, 20__; notice thereof was recorded in the office of the County Recorder of the County of ____, on the ____ day of ____, 20__.

3. Said assessment was levied in an assessment district known and described as “____.”

4. The assessment number of said property, as shown on the assessment diagram and in the assessment roll is No. ____, and the property designated as assessment number ____ and which belongs to ____ is described as
 follows:

(insert description)
5. Said assessment is payable in not more than ____ (_) annual installments, the first installment of which shall be June 2, 20__, and the last of which will be payable June 2, 20__. Said installments will be in even annual proportions of the whole amount. Payments of principal shall be represented by coupons attached to said certificate.

6. Interest will accrue upon said unpaid amount from the ____ day of ____, 20__, at the rate of ____ percent per annum until the whole of the principal and interest thereon shall have been paid in full. The interest is payable semiannually, by coupon, on the second day of December and June, respectively, of each year a principal payment coupon matures.

7. The officer or board whose duty it is to levy taxes on behalf of the owner of said property hereinabove described, is obligated to include in the next tax levy an amount, in addition to moneys for all other purposes, sufficient to pay ____ (____) or more of the principal of said assessment with interest on the unpaid principal of the assessment to date of payment and is obligated to include in each succeeding tax levy a like ____ (____) amount or more in addition to moneys for all other purposes until the principal of said assessment and all interest on the unpaid portions thereof shall be paid. Said tax levy shall be made notwithstanding that said tax levy exceeds the maximum tax rate that may otherwise be imposed by law.

8. In the event that the officer or board whose duty it is to levy taxes fails to provide for a tax levy to pay and discharge the principal of the assessment and the interest thereon, the owner of this
 certificate may compel the levy thereof in the manner hereinabove set forth by writ of mandate. No statute of limitations shall bar any right provided for herein to enforce the collection of this assessment and any interest due thereon until four years after the maturity of the last coupon of principal and interest due on this certificate.

9. The owner of this certificate described herein may use mandamus or other appropriate remedy to compel the officer or board whose duty it is to levy taxes for said obligated owner to levy an amount in a given year equal to ____ (____) of said assessment and interest on the unpaid portion thereof and may continue to use mandamus or other remedy to cause a like ____ (____) amount and interest to be levied each year until the whole of said assessment and all interest due has been paid.

10. If an owner of this certificate is successful in any
 action to compel the levy of a tax under this certificate the owner shall be awarded reasonable attorney fees as fixed by the court and costs and said attorney fees and costs shall be included in the tax levied to pay the same.

11. This certificate together with interest is payable to bearer at the office of the ____ treasurer of the ____ of ____ upon presentation of the coupons representing principal and interest thereon. Upon payment in full it shall be surrendered to the ____ treasurer for cancellation.

In witness whereof, said ____ has caused this certificate to be signed by its treasurer and has caused its clerk to affix thereto its corporate seal all on the ____ day of ____, 20__.Treasurer

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 266.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6467.1.

The interest upon the certificate provided in Section 6467 shall be payable semiannually, by coupon, on the second day of December and June, respectively, of each year a principal payment matures. The certificate shall bear date determined by the date of bonds if bonds are to be issued in the proceedings. If no bonds are to be issued the certificate or certificates shall bear such date as may be determined by the legislative body conducting the proceedings. The rate of interest shall not exceed 7 percent per annum on all unpaid sums.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

6467.2.

The certificates shall have annual principal coupons attached to them payable in annual order, the first of which shall be payable not later than June 2, beginning with the fiscal year next following the date of the certificate until all are paid. Each principal coupon shall be for an even annual proportion of the principal of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

6467.3.

The certificate shall be payable at the office of the treasurer of the city conducting the proceedings upon presentation of the principal and interest coupons. At least 30 days prior to the first day of July of each and every year after the date of the certificate, until the certificate is paid in full, the treasurer shall mail postage prepaid to the entity whose obligation it is to levy a tax to pay the amount of principal and interest falling due each year, a notice of the amount due in the next succeeding fiscal year, the date when payments are due upon the certificates, and that payment shall be made to the city conducting the proceedings by the entity obligated to levy
 the tax to make the payments due thereon at least 30 days prior to the due date of any installment of principal or interest upon said certificate. Failure of the treasurer to notify the entity obligated to make payment shall not affect the obligation of the entity, whose duty it is to make such payment, to make payment thereof as required by Section 5302.5 of this code.

In the event the public entity owning the property against which the assessment has been levied, and which is represented by the certificates authorized in this chapter, shall sell the said property prior to the maturity and payment in full of all of the certificates representing such assessment, then all of the outstanding certificates shall be immediately payable in full together with the accrued interest thereon not later than sixty (60) days from the date of sale without premium. Interest shall be payable to the date of designated payment and the owner of the certificates, as the owner appears
 upon the records of the treasurer, shall be given written notice of such payment at his last known address or, if not known, at general delivery. Interest upon said certificates shall cease and terminate at the date designated for payment thereof in full, provided funds for the payment of all such principal and interest to such date have been paid into the proper redemption fund therefor and are available for such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Issuance of Bonds to Represent Unpaid Assessments Against Publicly Owned Property [6468. - 6468.8.]

6468.

In addition to the method of collecting unpaid assessments against publicly owned property in use in the performance of a public function, as provided in Section 5302.5, and in addition to the issuance of the certificate provided in Section 6467, the legislative body may elect to have bonds issued to represent assessments against such publicly owned property as authorized in Section 5302.6 and as authorized in this chapter.

Such bonds shall be substantially in the following form:

STREET IMPROVEMENT BOND

Series (designating it), in the City (or County)
of (naming it)$No. (Assessment number) This bond is issued under and by virtue of the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 6468), Part 5, Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code as a result of proceedings taken by the legislative body of ____ (under the provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911) (under the provisions of the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913) and is payable out of the redemption fund for the payment of bonds issued to represent the unpaid assessments against publicly owned property owned by the City (County) of ____ hereinafter designated.

This bond is issued to represent the cost of certain public improvements benefiting such public property, which property is more fully described as assessment number(s) ____ in an assessment issued by the street superintendent of said ____ and recorded in the superintendent’s office.

Said assessment was levied on the ____ day of ____ 20__, in an assessment district known and described as “____”; notice thereof was recorded in the office of the County Recorder of the County of ____, on the ____ day of ____ 20__.

This bond is one of several bonds of like date, tenor and effect, but differing in amounts and maturities, issued by said city (or county) under said law for the purpose of providing means for paying for the work and improvements described in the resolution of intention in the assessment district proceedings hereinabove referred to, and to represent an unpaid assessment against
 publicly owned property. It is secured by the moneys in said redemption fund and by the unpaid amount of said assessment against said publicly owned property, and, including principal and interest is payable exclusively from said redemption fund and neither the (here insert city or county) nor any officer thereof is to be liable for payment otherwise.

The officer, officers, or board of the entity assessed whose duty it is to levy taxes, is obligated to include in the tax levy for each and every fiscal year of the period of the bonds of the series of which this bond is a part, an amount, in addition to moneys for all other purposes, sufficient to pay the interest falling due on all bonds outstanding of this series, plus the amount necessary to pay the principal of all bonds falling due each fiscal year of the life of this series of bonds. This levy shall be included each fiscal year during the life of this series of bonds, and until the principal and interest upon
 all bonds of this series shall be paid in full. The levy shall be in addition to any levy or levies made for all other purposes, and shall be made notwithstanding that the tax levy exceeds the maximum tax rate that may otherwise be imposed by law.

The Treasurer of the City (County) of ____ will on the second day of June 20__, solely out of said redemption fund, pay to the bearer the sum of ____ dollars ($____) with interest thereon from the ____ day of ____ 20__, at the rate of ____ percent per annum, all as herein specified and at the office of the treasurer of said city (county).

The interest is payable semiannually, to wit: on the second day of December and June of each fiscal year after the date of this bond, upon presentation of the proper coupons therefor; provided, that the first of said coupons is for interest to the second day of December, 20__, and thereafter the interest coupons are for the semiannual interest.
 The term “fiscal year” is defined to mean the period from July 1st to and including June 30th of the year following throughout the life of this series of bonds, the first of which fiscal years shall commence the July 1st following the date of this bond. This bond will continue to bear interest after maturity at the rate above stated; provided, it is presented at maturity and payment thereof is refused upon the sole ground that there is not sufficient moneys in said redemption fund with which to pay same. If it is not presented at maturity, interest thereon will run until maturity.

In the event the officer or board whose duty it is to levy taxes to pay for said bonds fails to provide for a tax levy to pay and discharge the principal of the bonds and the interest thereon, the owner of this bond may compel the levy thereof in the manner hereinafter set forth by writ of mandate. The writ of mandate shall include the right to compel the levy of an amount sufficient to
 pay principal and interest on all bonds issued to represent the same assessment.

The owner of this bond may use mandamus or other appropriate remedy to compel the officer or board, whose duty it is to levy taxes for said obligated owner, to levy an amount in a given year equal to the amount necessary to pay principal and interest on the unpaid portion of this series of bonds and may continue to use mandamus or other remedy to cause a like amount of principal and interest to be levied each year until the whole of the assessment and this series of bonds and all interest thereon has been paid.

If the owner of this bond is successful in any action to compel the levy of the tax under this bond the owner shall be awarded reasonable attorney fees as fixed by the court, and costs, and said attorney fees and costs shall be included in the tax levied to pay the same.

This bond may be
 redeemed and paid in advance of maturity upon the second day of December or June in any year by giving notice in the manner provided for giving of notice for redemption of bonds under the provisions of the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, and by paying principal and accrued interest together with a premium equal to ____ percent of the principal.

In witness whereof, said ____ has caused this bond to be signed by its treasurer and by its clerk and has affixed thereto its corporate seal all on the ____ day of ____ 20__.TreasurerClerk

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 267.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6468.1.

An annual proportion of the aggregate principal sum of bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be payable on the second day of June of every fiscal year beginning with the fiscal year next following the date of the bonds. The bonds shall bear interest at a rate not in excess of 7 percent per annum from the 31st day after recording the assessment in the office of the superintendent of streets of the entity issuing the bonds, or from their date if the work was done under the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, on all sums unpaid, until the whole of the principal sum and interest are paid.

Interest shall be payable
 semiannually by coupon, on the second day of December and June, respectively, of each fiscal year a principal payment accrues. If no bonds are to be issued in the assessment district proceedings other than bonds to represent unpaid assessments against publicly owned property, the bonds shall bear such date as may be determined by the legislative body conducting the proceedings, and shall bear interest from their date. The bonds will continue to bear interest after maturity at the rate stated; provided, they are presented at maturity and payment thereof is refused upon the sole ground that there is not sufficient moneys in said redemption fund with which to pay same. If they are not presented at maturity, interest thereon will run until maturity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 629.)
-------------------------------------------

6468.2.

The legislative body may by resolution establish the denomination of the bonds, the amount to mature each fiscal year and provide for the issuance and sale of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 629.)
-------------------------------------------

6468.3.

The final maturity of the bonds shall not exceed 24 years from that second day of June next succeeding this date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 629.)
-------------------------------------------

6468.4.

The treasurer shall keep a separate redemption fund, properly designated, into which he shall place all sums received by him from the collection of the assessments against public property for bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter and for interest and penalties thereon and from which fund he shall disburse and pay the bonds and the interest due thereon upon presentation of the proper bonds and coupons. Under no circumstances shall the bonds or the interest thereon be paid out of any other fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6468.5.

Sections 5302.6, 8653, 8654, 8655, 8670, 8672, 8673 and 8851 of this code are applicable to bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 629.)
-------------------------------------------

6468.6.

The bonds shall be payable at the office of the treasurer of the city conducting the proceedings. At least 30 days prior to the first day of July of each and every year after the date of the bonds, until the bonds are paid in full, the treasurer shall mail postage prepaid to the entity whose obligation it is to levy a tax to pay the amount of principal and interest falling due each year, a notice of the amount due in the next succeeding fiscal year, the date when payments are due upon the bonds, and that payment shall be made to the city conducting the proceedings by the entity obligated to levy the tax to make the payments due thereon at least 30 days prior to the due date of
 any installment of principal or interest upon said bonds. Failure of the treasurer to notify the entity obligated to make payment shall not affect the obligation of the entity, whose duty it is to make such payment, to make payment thereof as required by Section 5302.5 of this code. The treasurer shall place the funds in the redemption fund for the payment of such bonds, and interest thereon, such redemption fund to be separate from all other funds and to be used solely for said purpose until the interest thereon and the bonds are paid in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6468.7.

In the event that the public entity owning the property against which the assessment has been levied, and which is represented by the bonds authorized in this chapter, shall sell the property prior to the maturity and payment in full of all of the bonds representing such assessment, then all of the outstanding bonds shall be immediately payable in full together with the accrued interest thereon not later than sixty (60) days from the date of sale without premium. Interest shall be payable to the date of designated payment and the owner of the bonds, as the owner appears upon the records of the treasurer, shall be given written notice of such payment at his last known address
 or, if not known, at general delivery. Interest upon said bonds shall cease and terminate at the date designated for payment thereof in full, provided funds for the payment of all such principal and interest to such date have been paid into the proper redemption fund therefor and are available for such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6468.8.

The legislative body conducting the proceedings may elect in the resolution of intention to provide that the bonds issued to represent assessments against property in the use of the performance of a public function shall provide a prepayment premium not to exceed 5 percent of the principal amount of bond. In such case, the amount of the premium shall be inserted in the bonds described in Section 6468.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 629.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Division of Land and Bond [6480. - 6488.]

6480.

If any lot or parcel of land for which a bond has been issued is divided into two or more separate lots or parcels of land, including separate condominium interests, or if any two or more separate lots or parcels of land or separate condominium interests are combined into fewer lots or parcels, the bond or bonds may be surrendered and new bonds issued to the holder of the existing bond or bonds in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6481.

When it is desired that new bonds be issued, an application therefor in writing signed by the owner of any interest in any of the lots or parcels, including condominium interests, into which the original lot or parcel has been divided, or by the owner of the lots or parcels into which the original lots or parcels have been combined, shall be filed with the street superintendent. The application shall indicate how the original lot or parcel has been divided or how the original lots or parcels have been combined, request the street superintendent to apportion the amount remaining unpaid on the assessment in accordance with the division or combination, and be accompanied by a fee of five dollars ($5) for each separate part or parcel of land into which the original lot or parcel has been divided or for each original lot or parcel from which the newly combined lots or parcels were aggregated. If the legislative body determines that the fee set forth above is not sufficient to reimburse the city for the necessary administrative costs in processing applications under this chapter, the legislative body by resolution may fix a fee in an amount that will reimburse the city for the necessary costs in processing applications under this chapter. The street superintendent shall deposit all of these fees in the treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 2.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6482.

Upon receipt of the application and fee the street superintendent shall apportion to each separate part of the original lot or parcel of land the proportionate part of the amount remaining unpaid on the assessment that would have been levied thereon had the lot or parcel of land been so divided at the time the original assessment was made, or shall apportion to each combined parcel the proportionate part of the amount remaining unpaid on the assessment that would have been levied thereon had the parcel been so combined at the time the original assessment was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 3.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6483.

When the apportionment has been made an application signed by all persons owning an interest in the original lot or parcel or lots or parcels of land and by the holder of the existing bond on the lot or parcel of land or lots or parcels may be filed with the treasurer requesting that new bonds be issued for the amounts shown by the apportioned assessment. The application shall be accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the treasurer that it is signed by all of the necessary persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 4.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6484.

When the treasurer has ascertained that the application is signed by all the necessary persons he or she shall so advise the street superintendent. The street superintendent shall thereupon amend the recorded diagram and assessment to conform to the division or combination and apportionment and assign new assessment numbers to each separate part of the original lot or parcel of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 5.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6485.

The treasurer shall add to each apportioned amount a sum equal to 5 percent thereof but in no event more than ten dollars ($10) and shall make and sign a new bond in the same form as the existing bond, to represent each such apportioned amount, and the amount so added if the apportioned amount is fifty dollars ($50) or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

6486.

The bond shall be payable in installments at the respective dates of the payment of principal and interest on the existing bond, the number of such installments to be equal to the number of unpaid installments on the existing bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6487.

No new bond shall be issued when the apportioned amount is less than fifty dollars ($50). If it is less, the apportioned amount shall be paid to the treasurer in cash for the benefit of the holder of the existing bond at or prior to the time of filing the application referred to in Section 6483.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 631.)
-------------------------------------------

6488.

Upon the surrender of the existing bond the treasurer shall deliver to the bondholder or his agent or assigns the bonds issued for such apportioned assessments together with all payments of cash which may have been made pursuant to Section 6487.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Alternative Procedure for Division of Land and Bond [6490. - 6494.]

6490.

This chapter provides an alternative to the procedure for division of land and bond set out in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6480).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6490.5.

The legislative body may provide in the resolution of intention, along with its determination to issue bonds, that the bonds shall be divisible pursuant to this chapter. This chapter shall apply only if it is clearly stated on the bond that it is divisible pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6491.

(a) If any lot or parcel of land upon which there is an unpaid assessment represented by bonds issued under this division and to which this chapter is applicable is subdivided, including a division into condominium interests as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, or the ownership of a portion of the lot or parcel of land is transferred to another person, the owner of any interest in any of the lots or parcels into which the original lot or parcel has been divided, may file an application in writing with the legislative body.

(b) The application under subdivision (a) shall indicate how the original lot or parcel has been divided or transferred, and request the legislative body to apportion the amount remaining unpaid on the assessment in accordance with this chapter.

(c) The application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount to be determined by the legislative body, for each separate part or parcel of land into which the original lot or parcel has been divided or transferred. All application fees shall be deposited in the treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6491.5.

Upon receipt of the application and fee, the street superintendent shall determine, or cause to be determined, an apportionment of the unpaid assessment to each separate part of the original lot or parcel of land, as if the lot or parcel of land had been so divided at the time the original assessment was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 641.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6492.

After the apportionment has been determined pursuant to Section 6491.5, an application signed by all persons owning an interest in the original lot or parcel of land may be filed with the legislative body, requesting that the assessment as apportioned be adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6492.5.

(a) The clerk of the legislative body shall send a notice, by certified or registered mail, to the registered holder of any outstanding bond secured by the assessment to be apportioned, stating that an apportionment of an assessment has been requested, and indicating the numbers and amounts of the proposed apportionment. The notice shall also state that, unless a request for a hearing is received within 45 days from the date of mailing of the notice, the apportioned assessments shall become final and be recorded in the office of the street superintendent.

(b) If a request for a hearing under subdivision (a) is received, the legislative body shall file a report and conduct a hearing pursuant to Part 10 (commencing with Section 8730) of Division 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6493.

(a) At the time and place set for the hearing pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6492.5, and after hearing all protests, the legislative body may determine to divide the bond according to the proposed apportionment, or as amended by the legislative body during the hearing, upon a finding of both of the following:

(1) That the apportionment is in accordance with the proportionate benefits to be received by each of the resulting lots or parcels.

(2) That the apportionment does not impair the value or security of the outstanding bonds secured by the land being apportioned and that the lien-to-value ratio of each apportioned parcel is not less than that ratio for the original parcel based on an appraisal by an individual designated by a nationally recognized appraisal association. The value calculations shall exclude site improvements constructed subsequent to the date of confirmation of the assessment.

(b) The determination of the legislative body pursuant to subdivision (a) is final and conclusive.

(c) Upon that determination, the bond secured by the original parcel shall be returned by the bondholder, canceled on the books of the city, and exchanged for new bonds on the apportioned parcels in the same aggregate principal amount, of the same maturity, and at the same interest rate as the original bond. Thereafter, payment of principal and interest shall be due on the new bonds to the holder thereof in the same manner and on the same dates as were applicable to the original bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6493.5.

(a) If the clerk of the legislative body ascertains that the application has been signed by all of the necessary persons, and that no request for a hearing has been received, the clerk shall amend, or cause to be amended, the recorded diagram and assessment to conform to the proposed division and apportionment, and assign new assessment numbers to each separate part of the original lot or parcel of land.

(b) The clerk of the legislative body shall file the amended assessment with the treasurer, who shall annually enter upon the assessment roll the installments becoming due on each component part of the original parcel opposite a description of the respective parcels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6494.

If a city is the legislative body proceeding pursuant to this chapter and collections upon the assessments are made by county officials, the street superintendent shall transmit a copy of the amended assessment to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Default and Sale for Delinquency [6500. - 6518.]

6500.

(a) Whenever payment upon either the principal or the interest of any bond is not made to the bondholder when the coupon therefor is due, the holder of the bond, after sending the notice required by subdivision (b), may demand, in writing, that the treasurer proceed to advertise and sell the lot or parcel of land described in the bond as being that upon which the assessment represented by the bond was levied. If the holder of the bond has complied with subdivision (b) and deposits the required amounts, the treasurer shall proceed to advertise and sell the lot or parcel of land as provided in this chapter.

The treasurer may require the holder of the bond to deposit with him an amount of money estimated by the treasurer to be sufficient to reimburse the city for costs incurred in obtaining an abstract of title or title search of the real property to be sold, if the treasurer deems it necessary to determine ownership of the property. Amounts deposited which remain after these expenses have been paid shall be returned to the depositor or his representative.

(b) At least 30 days prior to demanding a sale by the treasurer for nonpayment of either principal or interest upon any delinquent bond on owner-occupied residential property, a bondholder shall send a notice by first-class mail, postage prepaid, of the delinquent amount along with the following notice to the owner of the property. The notice shall be substantially in the following form and be printed in red ink in at least 14-point boldface type:IMPORTANT NOTICEDear Property Owner:Your property located at(address)may be sold by the city (or county) because you have not paid what you owe for ________ improvements made in your area.To be sure to save your property, pay to the city (or county) treasurer the
 delinquent amount which is overdue or callby .(telephone number ofcity or county treasurer’simprovement bond unit) (date)

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1443, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1982.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 1443.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.

The treasurer shall mail a notice of sale to the owner of any property to be sold for nonpayment of either principal or interest upon any delinquent bond. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the owner of the property as shown on the last equalized assessment roll and to any person whose name appears as an owner on the records of the county assessor’s office which the county assessor will use to prepare the next assessor’s roll. The notice shall be substantially in the following form and the first paragraph shall be printed in at least 14-point boldface type: 
 IMPORTANT NOTICE
Your property located at (address) will soon be sold by the city (or county) unless you pay what you 
owe for ____ improvement made in your area. To obtain 
information on how to prevent the sale of your property, 
immediately call the foreclosure
 clerk at the city (or county) 
treasurer’s office. The telephone number is ____ to arrange for 
payment. For more detailed information regarding this matter, 
read the following: 
“Notice of Sale of Property Delinquent for Nonpayment of ____ Improvement Bond